Alabama, session 2026rs, HB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 9-11-54.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§9-11-54.1
(a) Beginning with the 2026 license year, an individual
eligible to be issued an annual license under Section 9-11-54
may purchase a lifetime license in lieu of an annual license
upon application and payment of a fee to the Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources as follows:
(1)a. Lifetime Disabled Resident Hunting License.
1. Individuals who are less than 50 years of age shall
be charged fifty dollars ($50) for a lifetime disabled
resident hunting license.
2. Individuals who are 50 years of age or older shall
be charged thirty dollars ($30) for a lifetime disabled
resident hunting license.
b. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be
deposited into the Alabama Game and Fish Endowment Fund.
(2)a. Lifetime Disabled Freshwater Fishing License.
1. Individuals who are less than 50 years of age shall
be charged fifty dollars ($50) for a lifetime disabled
Page 1

be charged fifty dollars ($50) for a lifetime disabled
HB271 Enrolled
resident freshwater fishing license.
2. Individuals who are 50 years of age or older shall
be charged thirty dollars ($30) for a lifetime disabled
resident freshwater fishing license.
b. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be
deposited into the Alabama Game and Fish Endowment Fund.
(3)a. Lifetime Disabled Resident Saltwater Fishing
License.
1. Individuals who are less than 50 years of age shall
be charged fifty dollars ($50) for a lifetime disabled
resident saltwater fishing license.
2. Individuals who are 50 years of age or older shall
be charged thirty dollars ($30) for a lifetime disabled
resident saltwater fishing license.
b. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be
deposited into the Alabama Marine Resources Endowment Fund.
(b) The department may charge an issuance fee of one
dollar ($1) for a license, including a combination of
licenses, issued pursuant to this section.
(c) The fees provided in this section are subject to
adjustment pursuant to Sections 9-11-68 and 9-11-69.
(d) Applications for a license pursuant to this section
or Section 9-11-54 may be filed in the office of the
Commissioner of the Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources, or as otherwise authorized by the commissioner, on
forms prescribed by the commissioner.
(e) A license issued pursuant to this section is not
transferable.
Page 2

transferable.
HB271 Enrolled
(f) A holder of a valid lifetime disabled resident
hunting or freshwater fishing license shall be entitled to all
of the privileges of a wildlife heritage license.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB271 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Mar-26 Passed



Page 4